Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1558.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10 O.S. 2021, Section 402, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 402. As used in the Oklahoma Child Care Facilities
Licensing Act:
1. “Adult” means an individual eighteen (18) years of age or
older, except for an individual who is in the legal custody of the
Office of Juvenile Affairs and jurisdiction has been extended beyond
eighteen (18) years of age pursuant to the provisions of the
Oklahoma Juvenile Code;
2. “Child” or “minor” means any person who has not attained the
age of eighteen (18) years, or an individual who is in the legal
custody of the Office of Juvenile Affairs and jurisdiction has been
extended beyond eighteen (18) years of age pursuant to the
provisions of the Oklahoma Juvenile Code;
3. “Child care center” means a program that operates thirty
(30) or more hours per week;

4. “Child care facility” means any public or private child care
residential facility, child-placing agency, foster family home,
child care center, part-day program, out-of-school time program, day
camp, drop-in program, program for sick children, family child care
home, or large family child care home providing either full-time or
part-time care for children away from their own homes;
5. “Child-placing agency” means an agency that arranges for or
places a child in a foster family home, adoptive home, or
independent living program;
6. “Foster family home” means the private residence of a family
which provides foster care services to a child, and includes a
specialized foster home, a therapeutic foster family home, or a
kinship care home;
7. “Foster parent eligibility assessment” includes a criminal
background investigation, including, but not limited to, a national
criminal history records search based upon the submission of
fingerprints, a home assessment, and any other assessment required
by the Department of Human Services, the Office of Juvenile Affairs,
or any child-placing agency pursuant to the provisions of Section 1-
7-106 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes. A foster parent
eligibility assessment shall be similar to the procedures used by
the Department of Public Safety for determining suitability of an
individual for employment as a highway patrol officer;
8. “Department” means the Department of Human Services;
9. “Division” means the section within the Department that is
assigned responsibilities pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma
Child Care Facilities Licensing Act;
10. “Family child care home” means a family home which provides
care and supervision for seven (7) or fewer children for part of the
twenty-four-hour day. The term “family family child care home” home
shall not include informal arrangements which parents make
independently with neighbors, friends, and others, or with
caretakers in the child’s own home;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1558 Page 2

11. “Full-time care” means continuous care given to a child
beyond a minimum period of twenty-four (24) hours;
12. “Large family child care home” means a residential family
home which provides care and supervision for eight to twelve
children for part of the twenty-four-hour day;
13. “Part-day child care program” means a program that provides
care and supervision for children and that operates for more than
fifteen (15) and up to thirty (30) hours per week;
14. “Program” means the business entity that provides care,
supervision, and learning opportunities for children;
15. “Rap back” means a notification from the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation to the Department of subsequent criminal
activity of individuals whose criminal background checks have been
completed pursuant to the requirements of the Oklahoma Child Care
Facilities Licensing Act;
16. “Residential child care facility” means a twenty-four-hour
residential facility where children live together with or are
supervised by adults who are not their parents or relatives;
17. “Responsible entity” means an individual who is authorized
to obligate the business; and
18. “Specialized service professional” means an individual from
an academic discipline or field of expertise who provides
individualized services to a child, such as behavioral or physical
therapists.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1558 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 23rd day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1558 Page 4